Louisiana, session 2026, SB252.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:410(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§410. Form of license; photograph, signature of licensee, anatomical gift statement,
declaration of life-sustaining procedures, interest in bone marrow
donation, and additional information on license
* * *
B.(1)(a) The Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall give the
widest possible dissemination to the anatomical donation program relating to eyes,
kidneys, entire bodies, etc., and shall make whatever provisions are feasible and
desirable, through its drivers licensing examining offices, to enable persons desiring
to make such anatomical donations to confirm their desires and intentions through
the use of suitable documents to be maintained and issued in all driver's license
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 252 ENROLLED
examining offices. Additionally the license issued by the department shall contain
an indication thereon whether or not the named applicant has elected to make an
anatomical gift pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter or R.S. 17:2351 et seq.,
said indication to be by placing an "X" in the appropriate box marked "Yes" or "No"
under or adjacent to the term "anatomical gift".
(b) The following information shall be made available free of charge to
applicants for a driver's license on a form to be promulgated by the department and
maintained on file with the department:
(i) An anatomical gift statement indicating the organs donated for the purpose
of transplantation or transplantation research;
(ii) A space for indicating any limitation or special wish of the donor; and
(iii) The signature of the donor and the witnesses to the signature of the
donor.
(c) If the applicant elects not to execute an anatomical gift statement at the
time of application, the statement shall remain blank when presented to the licensee
so it can be executed by the licensee at any time after the license is issued. No other
form or statement shall be required for the purpose of providing for the donation of
organs.
The Department of Public Safety and Corrections shall make provisions
through its driver's license examining offices that enable persons desiring to
make anatomical donations to confirm their desires and intentions through the
use of suitable documents to be maintained and issued in all driver's license
examining offices. The department shall provide to each applicant for a driver's
license or identification card information presented in equivalent form and
manner, without characterization, recommendation, or emphasis favoring
authorization or refusal, regarding the option to make or refuse an anatomical
gift, and shall provide the applicant the opportunity to indicate authorization
for an anatomical gift, refusal to make an anatomical gift, or no selection. Any
indication made by an applicant under this Subparagraph shall be recorded in
a manner prescribed by the department and shall have the effect provided by
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 252 ENROLLED
law governing anatomical gifts, refusals, and donor registries. Additionally, the
license issued by the department shall contain a clear indication of whether the
named applicant has authorized an anatomical gift, refused to make an
anatomical gift, or made no selection, displayed by placement of an "X" or
other clearly visible marking in the appropriate box corresponding to the
applicant's selection under or adjacent to the term "anatomical gift". No
applicant shall be required to make a selection as a condition of issuance or
renewal of a driver's license or identification card.
(b) The following information shall be made available, without charge,
to each applicant on a form promulgated by the department and maintained on
file by the department:
(i) A statement describing the option to make an anatomical gift for
transplantation or transplantation research and the option to refuse to make an
anatomical gift.
(ii) A space for the applicant to indicate authorization for an anatomical
gift, refusal to make an anatomical gift, or no selection, including any limitation
or special instruction the applicant chooses to express.
(iii) A space for the signature of the applicant and, where required by
law, any required witness or attestation.
(c) If an applicant makes no selection under Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph at the time of application or renewal, no authorization or refusal
shall be inferred. The absence of a selection shall not constitute authorization
for an anatomical gift, a refusal to make an anatomical gift, or a revocation of
any prior authorization or refusal, and shall have no independent legal effect
under R.S. 17:2351 et seq.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Driver's License
Anatomical Gift Consent Clarity Act".
Section 3. If any provision or item of this Act, or the application thereof, is held
invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions, items, or applications of the Act
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 252 ENROLLED
which can be given effect without the invalid provision, item, or application and to this end
the provisions of this Act are hereby declared severable.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective on June 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.